Washington statutes.
RCW 43.384.060

Receipt of gifts, grants authorized. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The board may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the authority and spend gift, grants, or endowments or income from public or private sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17A.560.

[ 2018 c 275 s 7.]

PDFRCW 43.384.060

Receipt of gifts, grants authorized. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The board may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the authority and spend gift, grants, or endowments or income from public or private sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 29B.45.020.

[ 2024 c 164 s 527; 2018 c 275 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.